Tennessee, session 114, SB1535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (41).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-253(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Post-conviction defender oversight commission, created by § 40-30-203;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1535
010093
- 1 -